Utah statutes.
26-26-2.   Authorization for institutions to obtain impounded animals.

Institutions may apply to the department for authorization to obtain animals from establishments maintained for the impounding, care and disposal of animals seized by lawful authority. If, after investigation, the department finds that the institution meets the requirements of this chapter and its rules and that the public interest will be served thereby, it may authorize the institution to obtain animals under this chapter.

